Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB658.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 630.1, 910, 951(e), 951.1 and 981.1 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 630.1. Affidavits of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, school district or poor district office, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, selected as 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 provided in section 630 of this act, shall file with the nomination certificate an affidavit stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court or for the office of school board in a district where that office is elective or for the office of justice of the peace, that he is not a candidate for the same office of any party or political body other than the one designated in such certificate; (f.1) that he is not a candidate for any other office; (g) that he is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (h) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the affidavit.Section 910. Affidavits of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, ward, school district, poor district, election district, party office, party delegate or alternate, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, shall file with his nomination petition his affidavit stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to 20250SB0658PN0697 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting nomination and election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court or for the office of school director in a district where that office is elective or for the office of justice of the peace that he is not a candidate for nomination for the same office of any party other than the one designated in such petition; (f.1) that he is not a candidate for any other office; (g) if he is a candidate for a delegate, or alternate delegate, member of State committee, National committee or party officer, that he is a registered and enrolled member of the designated party; (h) if he is a candidate for delegate or alternate delegate the presidential candidate to whom he is committed or the term "uncommitted"; (i) that he is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring pre-election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (j) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the affidavit. In cases of petitions for delegate and alternate delegate to National conventions, the candidate's affidavit shall state that his signature to the delegate's statement, as hereinafter set forth, if such statement is signed by said candidate, was affixed to the sheet or sheets of said petition prior to the circulation of same. In the case of a candidate for nomination as President of the United States, it shall not be necessary for such candidate to file the affidavit required in this section to be filed by candidates, but the 20250SB0658PN0697 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 post-office address of such candidate shall be stated in such nomination petition.Section 951. Nominations by Political Bodies.--* * *(e) There shall be appended to each nomination paper offered for filing an affidavit of each candidate nominated therein, stating--(1) the election district in which he resides; (2) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (3) that he is eligible for such office; (4) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting election expenses, and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (5) that his name has not been presented as a candidate by nomination petitions for any public office to be voted for at the ensuing primary election, nor has he been nominated by any other nomination papers filed for any such office; (6) that in the case where he is a candidate for election at a general or municipal election, he was not a registered and enrolled member of a party thirty (30) days before the primary held prior to the general or municipal election in that same year; (7) that, in the case where he is a candidate for election at a special election, he is not a registered and enrolled member of a party; [and] (8) that he is not a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the affidavit; and (9) that he is not a candidate for any other office.Section 951.1. Limitations on Eligibility of Candidates.--(a) Any person who is a registered and enrolled member of a party during any period of time beginning with thirty (30) days before the primary and extending through the general or municipal election of that same year shall be ineligible to be 20250SB0658PN0697 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the candidate of a political body in a general or municipal election held in that same year nor shall any person who is a registered and enrolled member of a party be eligible to be the candidate of a political body for a special election.(b) Subject to subsection (a), a candidate may not seek nomination or appear on a ballot for more than one public office in an election.Section 981.1. Affidavits of Candidates.--Each candidate for any State, county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, ward, school district, poor district or election district office, or for the office of United States Senator or Representative in Congress, selected as provided in sections 979 and 980 of this act, shall file with the substituted nomination certificate an affidavit stating--(a) his residence, with street and number, if any, and his post-office address; (b) his election district, giving city, borough, town or township; (c) the name of the office for which he consents to be a candidate; (d) that he is eligible for such office; (e) that he will not knowingly violate any provision of this act, or of any law regulating and limiting election expenses and prohibiting corrupt practices in connection therewith; (f) unless he is a candidate for judge of a court of common pleas, the Philadelphia Municipal Court or for the office of school board in a district where that office is elective or for the office of justice of the peace, that he is not a candidate for the same office of any party or political body other than the one designated in such certificate; (f.1) that he is not a candidate for any other office; (g) that he is aware of the provisions of section 1626 of this act requiring election and post-election reporting of campaign contributions and expenditures; and (h) that he is not 20250SB0658PN0697 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a candidate for an office which he already holds, the term of which is not set to expire in the same year as the office subject to the affidavit.Section 2. This act shall apply to elections held at least 90 days after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0658PN0697 - 6 - 123456